Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 9. General Provisions.

Sec. 16.05.902.
Personnel and equipment used in exploration work.

Alaska residents and equipment shall be given preference in exploration work to be done by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1969)

Sec. 16.05.903.
Big game photography contest. [Repealed, § 29 ch 132 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 16.05.905.
Activities by aliens prohibited.

Alien persons not lawfully admitted to the United States are prohibited from engaging in commercial fishing activities or taking marine mammals in the territorial waters of the state as they presently exist or may be extended in the future.

An alien person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a confiscation and forfeiture of the fishing vessel used in the violation, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by fine of not more than $10,000, or by all or any two of the foregoing punishments.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 85 SLA 1964)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly
AS

16.05.910

. Renumbered in 1992. In 1998, in subsection (b), “(a) of this section” was substituted for “
AS

16.05.905

” in order to reflect the 1992 renumbering of former AS

16.05.910

.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game and Wildlife Conservation, §§ 42, 43.

36A C.J.S., Fish, § 13.

Sec. 16.05.910.
Penalty. [Renumbered as AS 16.05.905(b).]

Sec. 16.05.920.
Prohibited conduct generally.

Unless permitted by AS 16.05 — AS 16.40 or by regulation adopted under AS 16.05 — AS 16.40, a person may not take, possess, transport, sell, offer to sell, purchase, or offer to purchase fish, game, or marine aquatic plants, or any part of fish, game, or aquatic plants, or a nest or egg of fish or game.

A person may not knowingly disturb, injure, or destroy a notice, signboard, seal, tag, aircraft, boat, vessel, automobile, paraphernalia, equipment, building, or other improvement or property of the department used in the administration or enforcement of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, or a poster or notice to the public concerning the provisions of this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, or a regulation adopted under this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52, or a marker indicating the boundary of an area closed to hunting, trapping, fishing, or other special use under this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52. A person may not knowingly destroy, remove, tamper with, or imitate a seal or tag issued or used by the department or attached under its authority to a skin, portion, or specimen of fish or game, or other article for the purpose of identification or authentication in accordance with this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52 or a regulation adopted under this title except AS 16.51 and AS 16.52.

History.

(§ 28 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 1970; am § 20 ch 132 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 107, § 2 (2003); am E.O. No. 114, § 4 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

Former subsections (c) and (d) were renumbered as AS

16.05.921

in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide provisions, see 5 AAC 1, art. 1.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 5, art. 3.

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 27, art. 3.

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 38, art. 4.

For special harvest areas, see 5 AAC 40, art. 2.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For methods and means, see 5 AAC 92, art. 4.

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Permitting authority over live game, that is, nondomestic animals, rests with the Board of Game as implemented by the Department of Fish and Game.
Aug. 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Neither the Board of Game nor the Department of Fish and Game has jurisdiction over domestic animals.
August 29, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Although no Alaska statutes or regulations expressly address sale of progeny of captive birds held under a permit, no law allows for it, and hence under subsection (a) it is not lawful; it makes no difference whether the permit is for scientific, educational, or propagative purposes. Oct. 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The rights acquired in wildlife such as birds held under a collecting permit are, unless otherwise specified, to be distinguished from the rights acquired under AS

16.40.010

—

16.40.030

to surplus bison and musk oxen and even those acquired under a permit to collect foxes for fox farming issued under AS

16.05.930(f)

. Oct. 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

A domestic or nondomestic animal becomes feral when it returns to a wild state. In the case of a partially domesticated or captive wild animal such as a fox that escapes, this generally means when the animal is no longer under the control of its owner or the owner is not in direct pursuit. In the case of a domestic animal such as a cow or pig that escapes, it is “feral” when it is living as a wild creature, and this may take more or less time depending on the circumstances. In the case of a domestic animal trespassing upon public lands, it could be declared “feral” under statute or regulation.
July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

No person may take a domestic animal that has become feral unless authorized by law or regulation.
July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The common law trust ownership principle means that game is not the subject of private ownership except insofar as the people may elect to make it so; the legislature has specifically established this principle in subsection (a). Oct. 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.921.
Venomous reptiles and insects or their eggs; prohibited conduct; permits.

A person may not import, possess, transport, or release in the state live venomous reptiles, live venomous reptile eggs, live venomous insects, or live venomous insect eggs, except in accordance with the terms of a permit issued under (b) of this section. This prohibition does not apply to bees as defined in AS

03.47.040

. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be cited as set out in AS

16.05.165

.

A permit required under (a) of this section may be granted only if, in the determination of the commissioner, the applicant demonstrates a valid educational purpose for seeking the permit. A valid educational purpose includes display in educational institutions and in zoos.

History.

(§ 21 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

16.05.920

(c) and (d). Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 16.05.925.
Penalty for violations.

Except as provided in AS

16.05.430

,

16.05.665

,

16.05.722

,

16.05.723

,

16.05.783

,

16.05.831

,

16.05.861

, and

16.05.905

, a person who violates AS

16.05.920

or

16.05.921

, or a regulation adopted under this chapter or AS 16.20, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In addition to a penalty imposed under (a) of this section or any other penalty for violation of this title or a regulation adopted under this title, a person who is convicted of unlawfully taking an animal listed in this subsection may be ordered by the court to pay restitution to the state in the amount set out in this subsection for each animal unlawfully taken:

Bear, black . . . . . $ 600

Bear, brown or grizzly . . . . . 1,300

Bison . . . . . 1,300

Caribou . . . . . 850

Deer . . . . . 400

Elk . . . . . 800

Goat . . . . . 800

Moose . . . . . 1,000

Musk oxen . . . . . 3,000

Sheep . . . . . 1,100

Wolf . . . . . 500

Wolverine . . . . . 500.

History.

(§ 22 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 30 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1996; am § 71 ch 21 SLA 2000; am E.O. No 107 § 3 (2003); am § 29 ch 75 SLA 2008; am E.O. No. 114 § 5 (2008))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992 a reference to AS

16.05.921

was inserted in subsection (a) to reflect the renumbering of former AS 16.05.920(c) and (d).

Cross references. —

For penalties for class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

and

12.55.135(a)

.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(a), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of (b) of this section “[applies] to an offense occurring on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008 explicitly declares that sec. 29, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (b) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 16.05.930.
Exempted activities.

This chapter does not prevent the collection or exportation of fish and game, a part of fish or game or a nest or egg of a bird for scientific or educational purposes, or for propagation or exhibition purposes under a permit that the department may issue and prescribe the terms thereof.

This chapter does not prohibit a person from taking fish or game during the closed season, in case of dire emergency, as defined by regulation adopted by the appropriate board.

AS

16.05.920

and

16.05.921

do not prohibit rearing and sale of fish from private ponds, the raising of wild animals in captivity for food, or the raising of game birds for the purpose of recreational hunting on game hunting preserves, under regulations adopted by the appropriate board. In this subsection, “animals” includes all animal life, including insects and bugs.

Nondomestic animals of any species may not be transferred or transported from the state under (a) of this section unless approved by the Board of Game in regular or special meeting. Animals transferred or transported under (a) of this section shall be animals that are certified by the department to be surplus and unnecessary to the sustained yield management of the resource. Each application for a permit under (a) of this section shall be accompanied by a statement prepared by the department examining the probable environmental impact of the action.

This chapter does not prevent the traditional barter of fish and game taken by subsistence hunting or fishing, except that the commissioner may prohibit the barter of subsistence-taken fish and game by regulation, emergency or otherwise, if a determination on the record is made that the barter is resulting in a waste of the resource, damage to fish stocks or game populations, or circumvention of fish or game management programs.

A permit may not be required for possessing, importing, or exporting mink and fox for fur farming purposes.

AS

16.05.330

—

16.05.723

do not apply to an activity authorized by a permit issued under AS

16.40.100

or

16.40.120

, or to a person or vessel employed in an activity authorized by a permit issued under AS

16.40.100

or

16.40.120

.

History.

(§ 28 art I ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 1974; am §§ 16, 17 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1976; am § 13 ch 151 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 23 SLA 1983; am § 23 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992 a reference to AS

16.05.921

was inserted in this section to reflect the renumbering of former AS 16.05.920(c) and (d). A related grammatical change was also made.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the enactment of (e) of this section, see § 1, ch. 151, SLA 1978, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

For possession and transportation, see 5 AAC 92, art. 6.

For use of game, see 5 AAC 92, art. 7.

For emergency taking, see 5 AAC 92, art. 9.

Legislative history reports. —

For letter of intent of the House Special Committee on Subsistence in connection with ch. 151, SLA 1978 (HB 960), see 1978 House Journal, p. 1154.

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is evident from the statutory langauge and purposes of subsection (f), which allows foxes to be collected to enhance the genetic stock of commercial fox farms, that the offspring of these foxes become the property of the fox farmer and may be sold. Oct. 20, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.935.
Restrictions on cooperation with federal government.

In recognition of the fact that the state has not assented to federal control of fish and game in Glacier Bay National Park and Preserve or the navigable waters within or adjoining the park and preserve, that the power to control the management of fish and game within the boundaries of the state is an incident of state sovereignty, and that the federal government cannot commandeer the lawmaking processes of the states to compel the state to enact and enforce a federal regulatory program, an agency, employee, or agent of the state may not expend funds to adopt or enforce the implementation of the federal regulatory program or a part of the program for control of fish and game in the park and preserve or the navigable waters within or adjoining the park and preserve that is in conflict with a state statute or regulation regarding management of fish or game within the park or preserve. This subsection does not prohibit an agency, employee, or agent of the state from

taking action necessary to protect life or property;

commenting on proposed federal statutes or regulations;

collecting data relating to claims of economic harm arising from the closure of the park and preserve to commercial fishing; or

participating in or cooperating with a federal program established under 16 U.S.C. 703 — 712 (Migratory Bird Treaty Act); 16 U.S.C. 773 — 773k (Northern Pacific Halibut Act of 1982); 16 U.S.C. 1361 — 1421h (Marine Mammal Protection Act); 16 U.S.C. 1531 — 1544 (Endangered Species Act); 16 U.S.C. 1801 — 1883 (Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act); 16 U.S.C. 3631 — 3644 (Pacific Salmon Treaty Act of 1985).

Nothing in this title authorizes the department or a board to enter into an agreement with a department or agency of the federal government that cedes state authority for the management of fish or game in the state to the federal government. In this subsection, “management” means the regulation of the method, manner, means, time, or place of taking of fish or game or the regulation of the amount of fish or game that may be taken.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1960; am §§ 2, 3 ch 56 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was formerly
AS

16.20.010(b)

and subsection (b) was formerly
AS

16.20.010(c)

. Renumbered in 2004.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings related to the enactment of subsection (a) (formerly AS

16.20.010(b)

), see § 1,
ch. 56, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Sec. 16.05.940.
Definitions.

In
AS 16.05
—
AS 16.40,

“aquatic plant” means any species of plant, excluding the rushes, sedges, and true grasses, growing in a marine aquatic or intertidal habitat;

“barter” means the exchange or trade of fish or game, or their parts, taken for subsistence uses

for other fish or game or their parts; or

for other food or for nonedible items other than money if the exchange is of a limited and noncommercial nature;

“a board” means either the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game;

“commercial fisherman” means an individual who fishes commercially for, takes, or attempts to take fish, shellfish, or other fishery resources of the state by any means, and includes every individual aboard a boat operated for fishing purposes who participates directly or indirectly in the taking of these raw fishery products, whether participation is on shares or as an employee or otherwise; however, this definition does not apply to anyone aboard a licensed vessel as a visitor or guest who does not directly or indirectly participate in the taking; “commercial fisherman” includes the crews of tenders or other floating craft used in transporting fish, but does not include processing workers on floating fish processing vessels who do not operate fishing gear or engage in activities related to navigation or operation of the vessel; in this paragraph “operate fishing gear” means to deploy or remove gear from state water, remove fish from gear during an open fishing season or period, or possess a gill net containing fish during an open fishing period;

“commercial fishing” means the taking, fishing for, or possession of fish, shellfish, or other fishery resources with the intent of disposing of them for profit, or by sale, barter, trade, or in commercial channels; the failure to have a valid subsistence permit in possession, if required by statute or regulation, is considered prima facie evidence of commercial fishing if commercial fishing gear as specified by regulation is involved in the taking, fishing for, or possession of fish, shellfish, or other fish resources;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of fish and game unless specifically provided otherwise;

“customary and traditional” means the noncommercial, long-term, and consistent taking of, use of, and reliance upon fish or game in a specific area and the use patterns of that fish or game that have been established over a reasonable period of time taking into consideration the availability of the fish or game;

“customary trade” means the limited noncommercial exchange, for minimal amounts of cash, as restricted by the appropriate board, of fish or game resources; the terms of this paragraph do not restrict money sales of furs and furbearers;

“department” means the Department of Fish and Game unless specifically provided otherwise;

“domestic mammals” include musk oxen, bison, and reindeer, if they are lawfully owned;

“domicile” means the true and permanent home of a person from which the person has no present intention of moving and to which the person intends to return whenever the person is away; domicile may be proved by presenting evidence acceptable to the boards of fisheries and game;

“fish” means any species of aquatic finfish, invertebrate, or amphibian, in any stage of its life cycle, found in or introduced into the state, and includes any part of such aquatic finfish, invertebrate, or amphibian;

“fish derby” means a contest in which prizes are awarded for catching fish;

“fish or game farming” means the business of propagating, breeding, raising, or producing fish or game in captivity for the purpose of marketing the fish or game or their products, and “captivity” means having the fish or game under positive control, as in a pen, pond, or an area of land or water that is completely enclosed by a generally escape-proof barrier; in this paragraph, “fish” does not include shellfish, as defined in AS

16.40.199

;

“fish stock” means a species, subspecies, geographic grouping, or other category of fish manageable as a unit;

“fish transporter” means a natural person who holds a fish transporter permit issued under AS

16.05.671

;

“fishery” means a specific administrative area in which a specific fishery resource is taken with a specific type of gear; however, the Board of Fisheries may designate a fishery to include more than one specific administrative area, type of gear, or fishery resource; in this paragraph

“gear” means the specific apparatus used in the harvest of a fishery resource; and

“type of gear” means an identifiable classification of gear and may include

classifications for which separate regulations are adopted by the Board of Fisheries or for which separate gear licenses were required by former AS 16.05.550 —

16.05.630

; and

distinct subclassifications of gear such as “power” troll gear and “hand” troll gear or sport gear and guided sport gear;

“fur dealing” means engaging in the business of buying, selling, or trading in animal skins, but does not include the sale of animal skins by a trapper or hunter who has legally taken the animal, or the purchase of animal skins by a person, other than a fur dealer, for the person’s own use;

“game” means any species of bird, reptile, and mammal, including a feral domestic animal, found or introduced in the state, except domestic birds and mammals; and game may be classified by regulation as big game, small game, fur bearers or other categories considered essential for carrying out the intention and purposes of AS 16.05 — AS 16.40;

“game population” means a group of game animals of a single species or subgroup manageable as a unit;

“hunting” means the taking of game under AS 16.05 — AS 16.40 and the regulations adopted under those chapters;

“nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of the state;

“nonresident alien” means a person who is not a citizen of the United States and whose permanent place of abode is not in the United States;

“operator” means the individual by law made responsible for the operation of the vessel;

“person with developmental disabilities” means a person who presents to the department an affidavit signed by a physician licensed to practice medicine in the state stating that the person is experiencing a severe, chronic disability

attributable to a mental or physical impairment or a combination of mental and physical impairments;

that is manifested before the person reaches 18 years of age;

that is likely to continue indefinitely;

that results in substantial functional limitations in three or more of the following areas of major life activity: self-care, receptive and expressive language, learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent living, and economic self-sufficiency;

that reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated;

and that the person is not a danger to themselves or others; and

and that the person does not suffer from a mental illness; in this subparagraph, “mental illness” means an organic, mental, or emotional impairment that has substantial adverse effects on a person’s ability to exercise conscious control of the person’s actions or ability to perceive reality or to reason or understand.

“person with physical disabilities” means a person who presents to the department either written proof that the person receives at least 70 percent disability compensation from a government agency for a physical disability or an affidavit signed by a physician licensed to practice medicine in the state stating that the person is at least 70 percent physically disabled;

“personal use fishing” means the taking, fishing for, or possession of finfish, shellfish, or other fishery resources, by Alaska residents for personal use and not for sale or barter, with gill or dip net, seine, fish wheel, long line, or other means defined by the Board of Fisheries;

“resident” means

a person who for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the time when the assertion of residence is made has maintained the person’s domicile in the state and who is neither claiming residency in another state, territory, or country nor obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another state, territory, or country;

a partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, or corporation that has its main office or headquarters in the state; a natural person who does not otherwise qualify as a resident under this paragraph may not qualify as a resident by virtue of an interest in a partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, or corporation;

a member of the military service, or United States Coast Guard, who has been stationed in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the time when the assertion of residence is made;

a person who is the dependent of a resident member of the military service, or the United States Coast Guard, and who has lived in the state for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the time when the assertion of residence is made; or

an alien who for the 12 consecutive months immediately preceding the time when the assertion of residence is made has maintained the person’s domicile in the state and who is neither claiming residency in another state, territory, or country nor obtaining benefits under a claim of residency in another state, territory, or country;

“rural area” means a community or area of the state in which the noncommercial, customary, and traditional use of fish or game for personal or family consumption is a principal characteristic of the economy of the community or area;

“seizure” means the actual or constructive taking or possession of real or personal property subject to seizure under AS 16.05 — AS 16.40 by an enforcement or investigative officer charged with enforcement of the fish and game laws of the state;

“sport fishing” means the taking of or attempting to take for personal use, and not for sale or barter, any fresh water, marine, or anadromous fish by hook and line held in the hand, or by hook and line with the line attached to a pole or rod which is held in the hand or closely attended, or by other means defined by the Board of Fisheries;

“subsistence fishing” means the taking of, fishing for, or possession of fish, shellfish, or other fisheries resources by a resident domiciled in a rural area of the state for subsistence uses with gill net, seine, fish wheel, long line, or other means defined by the Board of Fisheries;

“subsistence hunting” means the taking of, hunting for, or possession of game by a resident domiciled in a rural area of the state for subsistence uses by means defined by the Board of Game;

“subsistence uses” means the noncommercial, customary and traditional uses of wild, renewable resources by a resident domiciled in a rural area of the state for direct personal or family consumption as food, shelter, fuel, clothing, tools, or transportation, for the making and selling of handicraft articles out of nonedible by-products of fish and wildlife resources taken for personal or family consumption, and for the customary trade, barter, or sharing for personal or family consumption; in this paragraph, “family” means persons related by blood, marriage, or adoption, and a person living in the household on a permanent basis;

“take” means taking, pursuing, hunting, fishing, trapping, or in any manner disturbing, capturing, or killing or attempting to take, pursue, hunt, fish, trap, or in any manner capture or kill fish or game;

“taxidermy” means tanning, mounting, processing, or other treatment or preparation of fish or game, or any part of fish or game, as a trophy, for monetary gain, including the receiving of the fish or game or parts of fish or game for such purposes;

“trapping” means the taking of mammals declared by regulation to be fur bearers;

“vessel” means a floating craft powered, towed, rowed, or otherwise propelled, which is used for delivering, landing, or taking fish within the jurisdiction of the state, but does not include aircraft.

History.

(§ 9 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; § 2 art I ch 95 SLA 1959; am §§ 1 — 4, 23 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1961; am §§ 1, 2 ch 102 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 160 SLA 1962; am §§ 13, 14 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 110 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 82 SLA 1974; am §§ 26, 82 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 12 ch 105 SLA 1977; am §§ 14, 15 ch 151 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1980; § 4 ch 74 SLA 1982; am § 24 ch 132 SLA 1984; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 52 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 76 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 145 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 211 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 90 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 1 SSSLA 1992; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 112 SLA 2003; am § 31 ch 18 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1983, 1986, 1989, 1992, 2003, 2012, and 2016 to alphabetize the defined terms and to maintain alphabetical order. Former paragraph (13) was renumbered as
AS

16.05.662(b)

in 1992. Paragraph (25) was enacted as (38) and renumbered in 2016.

Both § 2, ch. 49, SLA 1992, and § 3, ch. 90, SLA 1992 amended former paragraph (12), now paragraph (17) of this section, defining “fishery”. Because the latter amendment took effect first and included the former amendment, paragraph (17) is set out as amended by § 3, ch. 90, SLA 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For Norton Sound-Port Clarence Area, see 5 AAC 1, art. 3.

For salmon fishery, see 5 AAC 5, art. 3.

For permits, see 5 AAC 92, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Sections 5 and 12, ch. 1, SSSLA 1992, which provided for a delayed repeal of former paragraphs (36) and (37), now paragraphs (7) and (8) of this section, defining “customary and traditional” and “customary trade” respectively, were themselves repealed by §§ 1 and 2, ch. 1, FSSLA 1998 before the delayed repeal took effect.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 32, SLA 1968 (HCSCSSB 50 am), see 1968 House Journal, p. 169.
For report on the 1974 amendment of former paragraph (2), now paragraph (4) of this section, defining “commercial fisherman,” ch. 127, SLA 1974 (SCSHB 817 am S), see 1974 House Journal, p. 657.

For legislative letter of intent in connection with the amendment to (4) of this section, defining “commercial fisherman,” by § 1, ch. 114, SLA 1988 (CSSB 309 (Res)), see 1988 Senate Journal 2027.

For an explanation of the 1994 amendment of (10) of this section, defining “domestic mammals,” see 1994 House Journal Supplement No. 12, February 22, 1994, page 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The paragraph defining “resident” did not grant special resident privileges to military personnel. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 2.

Term “customary trade” as used in the definition of “subsistence uses” allows for limited exchanges for cash other than for purely personal or family consumption. 1981 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

Definition of “subsistence uses” in terms of “customary and traditional uses of wild, renewable resources” reflects the equating of “subsistence use” with use by rural residents. 1981 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 11.

A domestic or nondomestic animal becomes feral when it returns to a wild state. In the case of a partially domesticated or captive wild animal such as a fox that escapes, this generally means when the animal is no longer under the control of its owner or the owner is not in direct pursuit. In the case of a domestic animal such as a cow or pig that escapes, it is “feral” when it is living as a wild creature, and this may take more or less time depending on the circumstances. In the case of a domestic animal trespassing upon public lands, it could be declared “feral” under statute or regulation.
July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

The statutory term “feral domestic animal” found in the definition of “game” is a contradiction in terms; any regulatory clarification should focus on what is a “feral animal” and explain that the term “feral domestic animal” is interpreted to mean a domestic or domesticated animal that has become feral. July 30, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

If factual information supported the proposition that it is “customary and traditional” to make handicraft articles from sea otter skins, and if sea otters are or have been taken customarily and traditionally for direct personal or family consumption as food, shelter, fuel, clothing, tools, or transportation, then skins of sea otters could be used for making handicrafts, even if the meat were not eaten.
If sea otters were not customarily and traditionally taken for food, shelter, fuel, clothing, tools, or transportation, it would arguably not be permissible to harvest the animals only for handicraft purposes under subsistence regulations. Mar. 14, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

A member of the military who claims Alaska residency, and who is transferred to another state, may be allowed to obtain a “resident” rather than a “nonresident” hunting or fishing license in that state, based upon the service member’s military status. Alaska statutes allow for such a limited availability of resident licenses for military personnel who are stationed in Alaska but claim residency elsewhere. Determination of each service member’s status must be made on a case–by–case basis, but where the licensing and residency laws of other jurisdictions mirror Alaska’s, a service member may obtain a “resident” license in the other jurisdiction without forfeiting Alaska residency.
2003 Op. Att'y Gen. 14.

Sec. 16.05.950.
Short title of the chapter.

This chapter may be cited as the Fish and Game Code.

History.

(§ 1 art I ch 94 SLA 1959)